Washington statutes.
RCW 36.86.050

Monuments at government survey corners.

The board and the road engineer, at the time of establishing, constructing, improving, or paving any county road, shall fix permanent monuments at the original positions of all United States government monuments at township corners, section corners, quarter section corners, meander corners, and witness markers, as originally established by the United States government survey, whenever any such original monuments or markers fall within the right-of-way of any county road, and shall aid in the reestablishment of any such corners, monuments, or markers destroyed or obliterated by the construction of any county road heretofore established, by permitting inspection of the records in the office of the board and the county engineering office.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.86.050. Prior: 1937 c 187 s 36; RRS s 6450-36.]